Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-116 Prohibited policy plans.
No life insurer shall issue for delivery or deliver in this State any life
insurance policy:

(1) Issued under any plan for the segregation of
policyholders into mathematical groups and providing benefits for a surviving
policyholder of a group arising out of the death of another policyholder of
such group, or under any other similar plan.

(2) Providing benefits or values for surviving or
continuing policyholders contingent upon the lapse or termination of the policies
of other policyholders, whether by death or otherwise. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next